North Dakota, session 69, HB1386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-27.2-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-27.2-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Computer-generated image" means an image or visual representation created through the
use of artificial intelligence or other computer program.
2. "Minor" means an individual under eighteen years of age or a computer-generated image
used, created, adapted, altered, or modified to appear to depict an individual under eighteen
years of age by face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristics.
3. "Obscene sexual performance" means any performance which includes sexual conduct by a
minor in any obscene material or obscene performance, as defined in section 12.1-27.1-01.
2.4. "Performance" means any play, motion picture, photograph, dance, or other visual
representation, or any part of a performance.
3.5. "Promote" means to procure, manufacture, issue, sell, give, provide, lend, mail, deliver,
transfer, transmit, ship, transport, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, or
advertise.
4.6. "Sexual conduct" means actual or simulated:
a. Sexual intercourse;
b. Sodomy, as defined under section 12.1-27.1-01;
c. Sexual bestiality;
d. Masturbation;
e. Sadomasochistic abuse, as defined under section 12.1-27.1-01;
f. Lewd exhibition of the buttocks, breasts, or genitals;
g. Nude or partially denuded human figure, as defined in section 12.1-27.1-03.1, if depicted
for the purpose of the sexual stimulation or the sexual gratification of any individual who
may view such depiction; or
h. Physical contact with a person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or
breasts. It is not necessary that the minor know that he or she is participating in the
described conduct, or any aspect of it.

H. B. NO. 1386 - PAGE 2
5.7. "Sexual performance" means any performance which includes sexual conduct by a minor.
6.8. "Simulated" means the explicit depiction of any of the conduct set forth in subsection 4 which
creates the appearance of actual sexual conduct and which exhibits any nude or partially
denuded human figure, as defined in section 12.1-27.1-03.1.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-27.2-04.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
12.1-27.2-04.1. Possession of certain materials prohibited.
1. A person is guilty of a class C felony if, knowing of its character and content, that person
knowingly possesses any motion picture, computer-generated image, photograph, or other
visual representation that includes sexual conduct by a minor.
2. An individual violating this section is guilty of a class B felony if :
a. The offense involved twenty or more images;
b. The offense involved sadistic or masochistic conduct or other depictions of violence;
c. The offense involved sexual bestiality;
d. The offense involves a prepubescent minor or a minor under twelve years of age; or
e. The individual has previously been convicted of an offense subject to registration under
section 12.1 - 32 - 15 .
3. This section does not impose liability on the provider of an interactive computer service, as
defined in 47 U.S.C. 230, or an internet service provider, cloud computer provider,
cybersecurity provider, communication service provider, or information service or
telecommunication service network, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, for any content provided by
another person.

H. B. NO. 1386 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1386.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 2 Absent 0
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State